North Dakota, session 69, HB1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 15-39.1-10 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half before January 1, 2020, the member's
required beginning date is no later than April first of the calendar year following the year the
member attains age seventy and one-half or April first of the calendar year following the year
the member terminates covered employment, whichever is later. For a member who attains
age seventy and one-half after December 31, 2019, the member's required beginning date is
no later than April first of the calendar year following the year the member attains age
seventy-two or April first of the calendar year following the year the member terminates
covered employment, whichever is later. Payments must be made over a period of time which
does not exceed the life expectancy of the member or the joint life expectancy of the member
and the beneficiary. Payment of minimum distributions must be made in accordance with
section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9)], as amended, and the
regulations issued under that section, as applicable to governmental plans.

H. B. NO. 1117 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1117.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 0 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State